Utah, session 2026, SB179.
Section 1. Section 34-23-301 is amended to read:34-23-301. Minimum hourly wages.The commission may establish minimum hourly wages for minors.  If there is an established minimum hourly wage for adults, the minimum hourly wages for minors may be established at a lesser amount. in accordance with Section 34-40-103.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 34-28-20 is enacted to read:34-28-20. Wage transparency required.(1)As used in this section:(a)"Benefit" means an employee receiving, as additional compensation resulting from the employee's position with an employer:(i)stocks;(ii)bonds;(iii)equity;(iv)ownership in a company; or(v)a bonus.(b)"Employer" means a person that employs at least 15 individuals in the state.(2)For each position the employer advertises in a job listing, an employer shall disclose in the job listing:(a)the projected minimum wages;(b)the projected maximum wages; and(c)each benefit that an employee may receive in the position.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 34-40-102 is amended to read:34-40-102. Definitions -- Joint employees -- Franchisors.(1)Subject to Subsection (3), this chapter and the terms used in it, including the computation of wages, shall be interpreted consistently with the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, 29 U.S.C. Sec. 201 et seq., as amended, to the extent that act relates to the payment of a minimum wage.(2)As used in this chapter:(a)"Adjust for inflation" means an increase or a decrease in accordance with the seasonally adjusted Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers the that Bureau of Labor Statistics within the United States Department of Labor publishes.(a)(b)"Cash wage obligation" means an hourly wage that an employer pays a tipped employee regardless of the tips or gratuities a tipped employee receives.(b)(c)"Commission" means the Labor Commission.(c)(d)"Division" means the Division of Antidiscrimination and Labor in the commission.(d)(e)"Federal executive agency" means an executive agency, as that term is defined in 5 U.S.C. Sec. 105, of the federal government.(e)(f)"Franchise" means the same as that term is defined in 16 C.F.R. Sec. 436.1.(f)(g)"Franchisee" means the same as that term is defined in 16 C.F.R. Sec. 436.1.(g)(h)"Franchisor" means the same as that term is defined in 16 C.F.R. Sec. 436.1.(h)(i)"Minimum wage" means the state minimum hourly wage for adult employees as established under this chapter, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise.(i)(j)"Tipped employee" means an employee who customarily and regularly receives tips or gratuities.(3)Notwithstanding Subsection (1), for purposes of determining whether two or more persons are considered joint employers under this chapter, an administrative ruling of a federal executive agency may not be considered a generally applicable law unless that administrative ruling is determined to be generally applicable by a court of law, or adopted by statute or rule.(4)(a)For purposes of this chapter, a franchisor is not considered to be an employer of:(i)a franchisee; or(ii)a franchisee's employee.(b)With respect to a specific claim for relief under this chapter made by a franchisee or a franchisee's employee, this Subsection (4) does not apply to a franchisor under a franchise that exercises a type or degree of control over the franchisee or the franchisee's employee not customarily exercised by a franchisor for the purpose of protecting the franchisor's trademarks and brand.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 34-40-103 is amended to read:34-40-103. Minimum wage -- Commission to review and modify minimum wage.(1)(a)TheOn or after May 6, 2026, the minimum wage for all private and public employees within the state shall be $3.35 is $20 per hour.(b)Effective April 1, 1990, the minimum wage shall be $3.80 per hour.(2)(a)After July 1, 1990, the Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), the commission may by rule establish the minimum wage or wages as provided in this chapter that may be paid to employees in public and private employment within the state.(b)The minimum wage, as established by the commission, that the commission establishes, may not exceednot at any time be lower than:(i) the federal minimum wage as provided in 29 U.S.C. Sec. 201 et seq., the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, as amended, in effect at the time of implementation of this section.; or(ii)the minimum wage established in Subsection (1).(c)(3)The commission:(i)(a)may review the minimum wage at any time;(ii)shall review the minimum wage at least every three years; and(iii)(b)shall review the minimum wage whenever the federal minimum wage is changed.; and(c)shall, in accordance with Subsection (2)(a), adjust for inflation the minimum wage at least once per calendar year.(3)The commission may provide for separate minimum hourly wages for minors.

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 34-40-106 is amended to read:34-40-106. Limitations on minimum wage imposed by cities, towns, or counties.(1)A city, town, or county may not establish, mandate, or require a minimum wage that exceeds the federal minimum wage as provided in 29 U.S.C. Sec. 201 et seq., Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938the established minimum wage under Section 34-40-103.(2)(a)A city, town, or county may not require that a person who contracts with the city, town, or county pay that person's employees a wage that exceeds the federal minimum wage as provided in 29 U.S.C. Sec. 201 et seq., Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938.(b)Subsection (2)(a) does not apply when federal law requires the payment of a specified wage to persons working on projects funded in whole or in part by federal funds.(c)Subsection (2)(a) applies to contracts executed on or after April 30, 2001.(3)(a)If a city, town, or county contracts with a person for the direct purchase of goods or services, in awarding or otherwise executing that contract, the city, town, or county may not give any preferential treatment to a person on the basis that the person pays that person's employees a wage that exceeds the minimum wage as provided in 29 U.S.C. 201 et seq., Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938.(b)This Subsection (3) does not apply when federal law requires the consideration of whether a person pays the person's employees a specified wage to persons working on projects funded in whole or in part by federal funds.(c)This Subsection (3) applies to contracts executed on or after May 2, 2005.(4)(a)The restrictions of this section on a city, town, or county apply to any entity created by the city, town, or county.(b)This Subsection (4) applies to contracts executed on or after May 2, 2005.

Section 6:
Section 6.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.